Utah statutes.
70A-4-108.   Time of receipt of items.

(1)  For the purpose of allowing time to process items, prove balances, and make the necessary entries on the books to determine its position for the day, a bank may fix an afternoon hour of 2 p.m. or later as a cutoff hour for the handling of money and items and the making of entries on its books.

(2)  An item or deposit of money received on any day after a cutoff hour so fixed or after the close of the banking day may be treated as being received at the opening of the next banking day.

